Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3158.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 34-18 of the General Laws entitled "Residential Landlord and Tenant
Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
34-18-63. Receipt for cash payment of rent.
A landlord shall provide a receipt to any tenant that makes a rental payment in cash at the
time the payment is received. The receipt shall indicate the amount of rent paid, when the payment
was received, the printed or typed names of both the landlord and tenant, and who accepted the
payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006155/SUB A
========